Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Qualified Business or Industry — Enterprises

§ 57-99-21.
Definitions.

As used in Sections 57-99-21 through 57-99-29, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Qualified business or industry” means any enterprise which is a project that has been certified by the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority (MMEIA) as a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiv).

“Qualified job” means full-time employment at the location of the manufacturing plant in this state of a qualified business or industry that has qualified to receive an incentive payment pursuant to Sections 57-99-21 through 57-99-29, which employment existed in this state at the location of the manufacturing plant on July 1, 2009.

“Full-time employment” means a job of at least thirty-five (35) hours per week.

“Rebate amount” means the amount of Mississippi income taxes withheld from employees in qualified jobs that is available for rebate to the qualified business or industry, provided that:

Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (d), the rebate amount shall be one percent (1%) of the wages and taxable benefits for qualified jobs;

In no event shall incentive payments exceed the actual Mississippi income taxes withheld from employees in qualified jobs that are available for rebate to the qualified business or industry; and

In no event shall the aggregate amount of incentive payments authorized under Sections 57-99-21 through 57-99-29 exceed Six Million Dollars ($6,000,000.00).

“MDA” means the Mississippi Development Authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 302, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 3, 2009.).

§ 57-99-23.
Quarterly incentive payments to qualified enterprises; duration of payments; application; job requirements; notification of State Tax Commission.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a qualified business or industry that meets the qualifications specified in Sections 57-99-21 through 57-99-29 may receive quarterly incentive payments for a period not to exceed ten (10) years from the State Tax Commission pursuant to the provisions of Sections 57-99-21 through 57-99-29 in an amount which shall be equal to the lesser of one percent (1%) of the wages and taxable benefits for qualified jobs or the actual amount of Mississippi income tax withheld by the employer for the qualified jobs.

In order to receive incentive payments, an establishment shall apply to the MDA by not later than July 1, 2010. The application shall be on a form prescribed by the MDA and shall contain such information as may be required by the MDA to determine if the applicant is qualified.

In order to qualify to receive such payments, the establishment applying shall be required to:

Be engaged in a qualified business or industry; and

The business or industry must maintain a minimum of one thousand two hundred (1,200) qualified jobs.

Upon approval of such an application, the MDA shall notify the State Tax Commission and shall provide it with a copy of the approved application. The State Tax Commission may require the qualified business or industry to submit such additional information as may be necessary to administer the provisions of Sections 57-99-21 through 57-99-29. The qualified business or industry shall report to the State Tax Commission periodically to show its continued eligibility for incentive payments. The qualified business or industry may be audited by the State Tax Commission to verify such eligibility.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 302, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 3, 2009.).

§ 57-99-25.
Creation of MMEIA Rebate Fund; purpose.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the “MMEIA Rebate Fund,” into which shall be deposited withholding tax revenue required to be deposited into such fund pursuant to Section 27-7-312. The money in the fund shall be used for the purpose of making the incentive payments authorized under Sections 57-99-21 through 57-99-29.

The liability of the State of Mississippi to make the incentive payments authorized under Sections 57-99-21 through 57-99-29 shall be limited to the balance contained in the fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 302, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 3, 2009.).

§ 57-99-27.
Filing of incentive payment claims; payments dependent on verification of number of qualified jobs created and maintained.

As soon as practicable after the end of a calendar quarter for which a qualified business or industry has qualified to receive an incentive payment, the qualified business or industry shall file a claim for the payment with the State Tax Commission and shall specify the actual number of qualified jobs created and maintained by the business or industry for the calendar quarter and the wages and taxable benefits thereof. The State Tax Commission shall verify the actual number of qualified jobs maintained by the business or industry. If the State Tax Commission is not able to provide such verification utilizing all available resources, the State Tax Commission may request such additional information from the business or industry as may be necessary.

If the business or industry does not maintain the job requirements of Sections 57-99-21 through 57-99-29 at any other time during the ten-year period after the date the first payment was made, the incentive payments shall not be made and shall not be resumed until such time as the actual verified number of qualified jobs created and maintained by the business or industry equals or exceeds the requirements of Sections 57-99-21 through 57-99-29 for one (1) calendar quarter.

An establishment that has qualified pursuant to Sections 57-99-21 through 57-99-29 may receive payments only in accordance with the provision under which it initially applied and was approved.

As soon as practicable after verification of the qualified business or industry meeting the requirements of Sections 57-99-21 through 57-99-29 and all rules and regulations, the Department of Finance and Administration, upon requisition of the State Tax Commission, shall issue a warrant drawn on the MMEIA Withholding Rebate Fund to the establishment in the amount of the rebate as determined pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for the calendar quarter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 302, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 3, 2009.).

§ 57-99-29.
Mississippi Development Authority and State Tax Commission to promulgate rules and regulations.

The MDA and the State Tax Commission shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, and all application forms and other forms necessary to implement their respective duties and responsibilities under the provisions of Sections 57-99-21 through 57-99-29.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 302, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 3, 2009.).